Utah statutes.
63M-1-3302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Director" means the director of the office.

(2)  "Executive director" means the director of the Governor's Office of Economic Development created in Section 63M-1-201.

(3)  "Office" means the Outdoor Recreation Office created in Section 63M-1-3304.



Enacted by Chapter 25, 2013 General Session

